Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 1. Big Game Guides and Transporters.

Cross references. —

For transitional provisions, see §§ 13 and 14, ch. 33, SLA 1996 in the Temporary and Special Acts.
For requirement that certain big game hunters engage a big game guide, see AS

16.05.407

and

16.05.408

.

Sec. 08.54.010.
Guide Board. [Repealed, § 18 ch 37 SLA 1989.]

Sec. 08.54.020.
Appointment and term of office. [Repealed, § 49 ch 94 SLA 1987.]

Secs. 08.54.030 — 08.54.141.
Board powers and duties, etc.; licensing. [Repealed, § 18 ch 37 SLA 1989.]

Secs. 08.54.142 — 08.54.146.
Transporter licensing. [Repealed, § 27 ch 71 SLA 1986.]

Secs. 08.54.150 — 08.54.180.
Miscellaneous licensing provisions. [Repealed, § 18 ch 37 SLA 1989.]

Sec. 08.54.185.
Additional fees. [Repealed, § 27 ch 71 SLA 1986.]

Secs. 08.54.186 — 08.54.240.
Exams; restricted areas; prohibitions; general provisions. [Repealed, § 18 ch 37 SLA 1989.]

Secs. 08.54.300 — 08.54.590.
Guides and related occupations. [Repealed, § 16 ch 33, SLA 1996.]

Sec. 08.54.591.
Creation and membership of board.

For the purposes of licensing and regulating the activities of providers of commercial services to big game hunters in the interest of the state’s wildlife resources, there is created the Big Game Commercial Services Board. For administrative purposes, the board is in the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development.

The board consists of nine members as follows:

two members who are current, licensed registered guide-outfitters;

two members who are licensed transporters;

one member of the Board of Game who is chosen by the Board of Game and who does not hold a guide or transport license;

two members who represent private landholders affected by guided hunting activities or transportation services and who do not hold a license issued under this chapter; and

two public members.

History.

(§ 3 ch 84 SLA 2005)

Sec. 08.54.595.
Board assistance.

State agencies shall provide the board with information, data, or technical assistance requested by the board for the purposes of licensing and regulating the activities of providers of commercial services to big game hunters.

History.

(§ 3 ch 84 SLA 2005)

Sec. 08.54.600.
Duties of board.

The board shall

prepare and grade

a qualification examination for a registered guide-outfitter license that requires demonstration that the applicant is qualified generally to provide guided and outfitted hunts and, in particular, possesses knowledge of fishing, hunting, and guiding laws and regulations; and

a certification examination for each game management unit in which the registered guide-outfitter intends to provide big game hunting services; the examination must require demonstration that the registered guide-outfitter is qualified to provide guided and outfitted hunts in the game management unit for which the registered guide-outfitter seeks to be certified and, in particular, must require demonstration that the registered guide-outfitter possesses knowledge of the terrain, transportation problems, game, and other characteristics of the game management unit;

authorize the issuance of registered guide-outfitter, master guide-outfitter, class-A assistant guide, assistant guide, and transporter licenses after the applicant for the license satisfies the requirements for the license;

impose appropriate disciplinary sanctions on a licensee under AS

08.54.600

—

08.54.790

;

require an applicant for issuance or renewal of any class of guide license or of a transporter license to state in a written and signed document whether the applicant’s right to obtain, or exercise the privileges granted by, a hunting, guiding, outfitting, or transportation services license is revoked or suspended in this state or another state or in Canada;

regularly disseminate information regarding examinations and other qualifications for all classes of guide licenses to residents of the rural areas of the state;

adopt procedural and substantive regulations required by this chapter;

provide for administration of examinations for registered guide-outfitters at least twice a year;

meet at least twice annually.

The board shall provide for administration of an oral examination for a registered guide-outfitter license or for a game management unit certification if requested at the time of application for the license.

In addition to the regulations required under (a) of this section, the board may adopt regulations the board considers appropriate, including regulations to

establish a code of ethics for professions regulated by the board;

establish requirements for the contents of written contracts to provide big game hunting services and transportation services to clients;

authorize the department to request a copy of a big game hunting services or transportation services contract entered into by a person licensed under this chapter.

History.

(§ 3 ch 33 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 61 SLA 1997; am §§ 4, 5 ch 84 SLA 2005; am § 1 ch 73 SLA 2012)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in this section in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in (a) of this section, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For guide license qualifications, see 12 AAC 75, art. 1.

For registered guide-outfitter operations, see 12 AAC 75, art. 2.

For professional ethics standards for guides, see 12 AAC 75, art. 3.

For transportation services, see 12 AAC 75, art. 4.

Sec. 08.54.605.
Eligibility for licenses.

Notwithstanding AS

08.54.610

,

08.54.620

,

08.54.630

,

08.54.650

, and

08.54.660

, a person may not receive, hold, or renew a registered guide-outfitter license, master guide-outfitter license, class-A assistant guide license, assistant guide license, or transporter license if

the person has been convicted of

a violation of a state or federal hunting, guiding, or transportation services statute or regulation for which

the person was imprisoned for more than five days within the previous five years;

an unsuspended fine of more than $2,000 was imposed in the previous 12 months;

an unsuspended fine of more than $3,000 was imposed in the previous 36 months; or

an unsuspended fine of more than $5,000 was imposed in the previous 60 months;

a felony within the last five years; or

a felony offense against the person under AS 11.41 within the last 10 years; or

the person’s right to obtain, or exercise the privileges granted by, a hunting, guiding, outfitting, or transportation services license is suspended or revoked in this state or another state or in Canada.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, (a)(1)(B) and (C) of this section are not applicable to offenses committed by a person who receives or received any class of guide license or a transporter license under sec. 13, ch. 33, SLA 1996, if the offense was committed before May 23, 1996. This subsection does not apply when a person applies for a license that is different from the class of guide license or the transporter license received under sec. 13, ch. 33, SLA 1996.

A person may not receive a certification for a game management unit if the person is prohibited by (a) of this section from receiving or renewing a registered guide-outfitter license or master guide-outfitter license.

History.

(§ 3 ch 33 SLA 1996; am §§ 2, 3 ch 61 SLA 1997; am § 1 ch 33 SLA 1999; am §§ 6, 7 ch 84 SLA 2005; am § 3 ch 26 SLA 2019)

Administrative Code. —

For guide license qualifications, see 12 AAC 75, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective September 14, 2019, inserted “, hold,” in the introductory paragraph of (a).

Sec. 08.54.608.
Retired status license.

On retiring from guiding or outfitting, or both, and on payment of an appropriate one-time fee, an individual who has held a license issued under AS

08.54.610

,

08.54.620

, or

08.54.630

that has not been suspended or revoked under AS

08.54.710

may apply for a retired status license. The retired status license shall indicate whether the individual was licensed as a master guide-outfitter, registered guide-outfitter, class-A assistant guide, or assistant guide. An individual holding a retired status license may not guide, outfit, or take charge of a camp in the state under the retired status license. A retired status license is valid for the life of the license holder and does not require renewal.

An individual with a retired status license issued under (a) of this section may apply for a new registered guide-outfitter license under AS

08.54.610

, a new class-A assistant guide license under AS

08.54.620

, or a new assistant guide license under AS

08.54.630

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 73 SLA 2012)

Sec. 08.54.610.
Registered guide-outfitter license.

A natural person is entitled to a registered guide-outfitter license if the person

is 21 years of age or older;

has practical field experience in the handling of firearms, hunting, judging trophies, field preparation of meat and trophies, first aid, photography, and related guiding and outfitting activities;

either

has passed the qualification examination prepared by the board under AS

08.54.600

; or

provides evidence of 25 years of experience as a class-A assistant guide or class-A assistant guide-outfitter;

has passed a certification examination prepared by the board under AS

08.54.600

for at least one game management unit;

has legally hunted big game in the state for part of each of any five years in a manner directly contributing to the person’s experience and competency as a guide;

has been licensed as and performed the services of a class-A assistant guide or assistant guide, or of a class-A assistant guide-outfitter or assistant guide-outfitter under former AS

08.54.300

— 08.54.590, in the state for a part of each of three years;

is capable of performing the essential duties associated with guiding and outfitting;

has been favorably recommended in writing by eight big game hunters whose recommendations have been solicited by the department from a list provided by the applicant, including at least two favorable recommendations for each year of any three years during which the person was a class-A assistant guide or assistant guide, or a class-A assistant guide-outfitter or assistant guide-outfitter under former AS

08.54.300

— 08.54.590;

has provided proof of financial responsibility if required by the department under AS

08.54.680

; and

has applied for a registered guide-outfitter license on a form provided by the department and paid the license application fee and the registered guide-outfitter license fee.

A master guide-outfitter license authorizes a registered guide-outfitter to use the title master guide-outfitter, but is for all other purposes under this chapter a registered guide-outfitter license. A natural person is entitled to receive a renewable master guide-outfitter license if the person

is, at the time of application for a master guide-outfitter license, licensed as a registered guide-outfitter under this section;

has been licensed in this state as a registered guide or a guide- outfitter, under former AS

08.54.010

— 08.54.240, former AS

08.54.300

— 08.54.590, or this chapter, for at least 15 of the last 20 years, including the year immediately preceding the year in which the person applies for a master guide-outfitter license;

submits a list to the department of at least 45 clients for whom the person has personally provided guiding or outfitting services and the person receives a favorable evaluation from 30 of the clients selected from the list by the department;

has not been convicted of an offense under AS

08.54.720(a)

or a similar law in another jurisdiction related to hunting or to the provision of big game hunting or transportation services within the five years preceding the date of the application for which

the person was imprisoned for more than one day; or

an unsuspended fine of more than $1,500 was imposed;

has not had a hunting, guiding, outfitting, transporter, or similar license suspended or revoked in this state or another jurisdiction within the five years preceding the date of the application; and

applies for a master guide-outfitter license on a form provided by the department and pays the application fee, if any.

A registered guide-outfitter may contract to guide or outfit hunts for big game and may provide transportation services, personally or through an assistant, to big game hunters who are clients of the registered guide-outfitter.

Notwithstanding AS

08.54.750

, a person who is licensed as a registered guide-outfitter may be employed by another registered guide-outfitter to provide the services of

a class-A assistant guide in a game management unit if the registered guide-outfitter providing the services of a class-A assistant guide is able to demonstrate, to the satisfaction of the board, adequate knowledge of and experience in the game management unit; and

an assistant guide in any game management unit.

A registered guide-outfitter who contracts for a guided hunt shall be primarily in the field supervising and participating in the contracted hunt. The contracting registered guide-outfitter shall also conduct the hunt, unless the hunt, under regulations adopted by the board, is being conducted by a class-A assistant guide or a registered guide-outfitter employed by the contracting registered guide-outfitter.

History.

(§ 3 ch 33 SLA 1996; am § 4 ch 61 SLA 1997; am § 8 ch 84 SLA 2005; am §§ 3, 4 ch 73 SLA 2012; am § 4 ch 26 SLA 2019; am § 1 ch 19 SLA 2021)

Administrative Code. —

For guide license qualifications, see 12 AAC 75, art. 1.

For registered guide-outfitter operations, see 12 AAC 75, art. 2.

For transportation services, see 12 AAC 75, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective September 14, 2019, in (b)(2), substituted “for at least 15 of the last 20 years” for “for at least 12 of the last 15 years,” in (b)(3), substituted “45 clients” for “25 clients” and “30 of the clients” for “10 of the clients,” added (b)(4), redesignated former (b)(4) as (b)(5), and made related stylistic changes.

The 2021 amendment, effective July 14, 2021, in (b), in (b)(4), in the introductory language, substituted “within the five years” for “within the 15 years”, added “for which” at the end, added (b)(4)(A) and (B), added (b)(5), redesignated former (b)(5) as (b)(6).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 3,
ch. 19, SLA 2021, makes the 2021 amendment to subsection (b) retroactive to September 14, 2019.

Sec. 08.54.620.
Class-A assistant guide license.

A natural person is entitled to a class-A assistant guide license if the person

is 21 years of age or older;

applies for a class-A assistant guide license on a form provided by the department and pays the license application fee and the license fee;

possesses a current first aid card issued by the Red Cross or a similar organization; and

either

has

been employed during at least three calendar years as any class of licensed guide in the game management unit for which the license is sought; and

at least 10 years’ hunting experience in the state; military service outside of the state for not more than three years shall be accepted as part of the required 10 years’ hunting experience;

provides

evidence that the person physically resides in the game management unit in which the person is to be employed;

evidence that the person has had at least 15 years’ hunting experience in the game management unit in which the person is to be employed; military service outside of the state for not more than three years shall be accepted as part of the required 15 years’ hunting experience; and

a written recommendation from a registered guide-outfitter who intends to employ the person as a class-A assistant guide; or

provides evidence that the person

physically resides in the game management unit in which the person is to be employed;

has at least 10 years’ hunting experience in the state; military service outside of the state for not more than three years shall be accepted as part of the required 10 years’ hunting experience; and

has passed a class-A assistant guide training course approved by the board.

A class-A assistant guide

may not contract to guide or outfit a big game hunt;

shall be employed by and under the supervision of a registered guide-outfitter who has contracted with the client for whom the class-A assistant guide is conducting the hunt;

may take charge of a camp and provide guide services from the camp without the contracting registered guide-outfitter being in the field and participating in the contracted hunt if the contracting registered guide-outfitter is supervising the guiding activities;

may not perform functions of a class-A assistant guide outside of the game management unit for which the license is issued; and

may be employed by a registered guide-outfitter to perform the functions of an assistant guide in any game management unit.

History.

(§ 3 ch 33 SLA 1996; am § 9 ch 84 SLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For guide license qualifications, see 12 AAC 75, art. 1.

For registered guide-outfitter operations, see 12 AAC 75, art. 2.

Sec. 08.54.630.
Assistant guide license.

A natural person is entitled to an assistant guide license if the person

is 18 years of age or older;

has legally hunted big game in the state during two calendar years;

possesses a first aid card issued by the Red Cross or a similar organization;

either

obtains a written recommendation from a registered guide-outfitter who intends to employ the person as an assistant guide; or

provides evidence that the person passed an assistant guide training course approved by the board; and

applies for an assistant guide license on a form provided by the department and pays the license application fee and the license fee.

An assistant guide

may not contract to guide or outfit a big game hunt;

shall be employed by a registered guide-outfitter and under the supervision of a registered guide-outfitter or class-A assistant guide while the assistant guide is in the field on guided hunts; and

may not take charge of a camp or provide guide services unless the contracting registered guide-outfitter is in the field and participating in the contracted hunt or a registered guide-outfitter or class-A assistant guide employed by the contracting guide is physically present and supervising the hunt.

History.

(§ 3 ch 33 SLA 1996; am § 10 ch 84 SLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For guide license qualifications, see 12 AAC 75, art. 1.

For registered guide-outfitter operations, see 12 AAC 75, art. 2.

Sec. 08.54.635.
Delegation of services; training.

A registered guide-outfitter who contracts to guide a big game hunt may, under regulations adopted by the board, delegate to a person not licensed under this chapter the services of

packing, preparing, salvaging, or caring for a client’s meat;

packing trophies; and

packing camping equipment.

For training purposes established by the board in regulation, a person who is not licensed under this chapter may assist in providing the guide services of field preparation of trophies, stalking, pursuing, tracking, killing, or attempting to kill big game, and using guiding or outfitting equipment, including spotting scopes and firearms, for the benefit of a hunter. An unlicensed person may only assist in providing a guide service under this subsection if a licensed registered guide-outfitter, class-A assistant guide, or assistant guide is physically present and the class-A assistant guide or assistant guide is employed by and under the supervision of the registered guide-outfitter who contracted for the big game hunt.

A person who does not hold a license issued under this chapter may provide or assist in providing the services identified under this section only if the person meets requirements adopted by the board. A person who provides or assists in providing guide services under this section may receive compensation for providing the services.

History.

(§ 1 ch 49 SLA 2014)

Effective dates. —

Section 1, ch. 49, SLA 2014, which enacted this section, took effect on September 18, 2014.

Sec. 08.54.640.
Law enforcement officers and game biologists.

Notwithstanding AS

08.54.610

—

08.54.630

and except as provided in (b) of this section, a person may not hold, or earn experience credits to apply for, a registered guide-outfitter license under this chapter, while the person is a law enforcement officer and for three months after terminating the person’s status as a law enforcement officer.

A registered guide-outfitter license, class-A assistant guide license, or assistant guide license issued under this chapter, or under former provisions of AS

08.54.300

— 08.54.590, after May 16, 1992, is suspended if the person to whom the license is issued subsequently becomes a law enforcement officer. A person whose license is subject to suspension under this subsection shall notify the department that the person has become a law enforcement officer within 30 days after becoming a law enforcement officer. The suspension of a license under this subsection remains in effect until three months have elapsed from the date on which the licensee provides written notification to the department of the fact that the person is no longer a law enforcement officer. A person whose license is suspended under this subsection is not required to renew the license or pay license renewal fees for the period of suspension. Once a suspension of a license is terminated, the licensee may provide, without further payment of a guide license fee, the guide services authorized by the license for the remainder of the licensing period in which the suspension is terminated. Notwithstanding other provisions of this subsection, if a person whose license is suspended under this subsection fails to notify the department within one year after the person is no longer a law enforcement officer, the person’s license lapses and the person is eligible for reissuance of the license only as provided in AS

08.54.670

. The board may adopt regulations to implement this subsection.

A person who holds any class of guide license and who is employed by the Department of Fish and Game or a federal wildlife management agency may not, while employed by the department or agency as a game or wildlife biologist and for 12 months after leaving employment with the department or agency as a game or wildlife biologist, engage in providing big game hunting services in a game management unit in which the person conducted game or wildlife management or research activities for the department or agency at any time during the preceding 12 months.

In this section, “law enforcement officer” means a person who is

employed by the Department of Public Safety as a state trooper or as a law enforcement officer engaged in fish and wildlife protection; or

employed as a fish and wildlife law enforcement officer by the United States Department of the Interior or the United States Department of Agriculture.

History.

(§ 3 ch 33 SLA 1996; am §§ 11, 12 ch 84 SLA 2005)

Sec. 08.54.650.
Transporter license.

A person is entitled to a transporter license if the person

applies for a transporter license on a form provided by the department; and

pays the license application fee and the license fee.

A transporter may provide transportation services and accommodations to big game hunters in the field at a permanent lodge, house, or cabin owned by the transporter or on a boat with permanent living quarters located on salt water. A transporter may not provide big game hunting services without holding the appropriate license.

A transporter shall provide an annual activity report on a form provided by the department. An activity report must contain all information required by the board by regulation.

History.

(§ 3 ch 33 SLA 1996; am § 13 ch 84 SLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For guide license qualifications, see 12 AAC 75, art. 1.

For transportation services, see 12 AAC 75, art. 4.

Sec. 08.54.660.
Renewal of guide and transporter licenses.

An applicant for renewal of a registered guide-outfitter, class-A assistant guide, assistant guide, or transporter license shall submit

a request for renewal of the license on a form provided by the department; and

the appropriate license fee for the next licensing period.

The department may not renew a registered guide-outfitter license under this section unless all fees have been paid in full and the registered guide-outfitter has signed an affidavit that all hunt records due during the term of the current license have been filed with the department.

The department may not renew a transporter license unless all fees have been paid in full and the transporter has signed an affidavit that all activity reports due during the term of the current license have been filed with the department.

History.

(§ 3 ch 33 SLA 1996; am § 14 ch 84 SLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For guide license qualifications, see 12 AAC 75, art. 1.

For registered guide-outfitter operations, see 12 AAC 75, art. 2.

For transportation services, see 12 AAC 75, art. 4.

Sec. 08.54.670.
Failure to renew.

The department may not issue a license to a person who held a registered guide-outfitter, class-A assistant guide, or assistant guide license and who has failed to renew the license under this chapter for four consecutive years unless the person again meets the qualifications for initial issuance of the license.

History.

(§ 3 ch 33 SLA 1996; am § 15 ch 84 SLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For guide license qualifications, see 12 AAC 75, art. 1.

Sec. 08.54.680.
Financial responsibility and other requirements for guides and transporters.

The department may require a registered guide, who contracts to guide or outfit a big game hunt, or a transporter to provide proof of financial responsibility up to the amount of $100,000. A registered guide or transporter may demonstrate financial responsibility by assets, insurance, or a bond in the requisite amount.

If a registered guide-outfitter, class-A assistant guide, or assistant guide personally pilots an aircraft to transport clients during the provision of big game hunting services, the registered guide-outfitter, class-A assistant guide, or assistant guide shall have a commercial pilot’s rating or a minimum of 500 hours of flying time in the state.

On or after January 1, 2006, a registered guide-outfitter may not provide big game hunting services and a transporter may not provide transportation services unless the registered guide-outfitter or transporter has entered into a written contract with the client for the provision of those services. A contract to provide big game hunting services must include at least the following information: the name and guide license number of the registered guide-outfitter, the name of the client, a listing of the big game to be hunted, the approximate time and dates that the client will be in the field, a statement as to what transportation is provided by the registered guide-outfitter, a statement as to whether accommodations and meals in the field are provided by the registered guide-outfitter, and a statement of the amount to be paid for the big game hunting services provided. A contract to provide transportation services must include at least the following information: the name and transporter license number of the transporter, the name of the client, a listing of the big game to be hunted, the approximate time and dates that the client will be in the field, and a statement of the amount to be paid for the transportation services provided. A registered guide-outfitter or transporter shall provide a copy of contracts to provide big game hunting services or transportation services, as appropriate, to the department upon the request of the department. Except as necessary for disciplinary proceedings conducted by the board and as necessary for law enforcement purposes by the Department of Public Safety and the Department of Law, a copy of a contract provided to the department is confidential. The department may provide a copy of contracts in the possession of the department to the Department of Fish and Game or the Department of Natural Resources upon the request of that department if the department receiving the copy agrees to maintain the confidentiality of the contracts.

History.

(§ 3 ch 33 SLA 1996; am §§ 16, 17 ch 84 SLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For registered guide-outfitter operations, see 12 AAC 75, art. 2.

For professional ethics standards for guides, see 12 AAC 75, art. 3.

For transportation services, see 12 AAC 75, art. 4.